Connecticut, session 2026, SB00067.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That title 12 of the general statutes be amended to establish a cap on
the amount of aggregate personal income tax revenue that the state may
collect, with any amount collected in excess of such cap to be refunded
to taxpayers on a pro rata basis.